Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.611

Administrative dissolution.

The secretary of state may dissolve a limited partnership administratively under the circumstances and procedures specified in Article 6 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6118; 2009 c 188 s 809.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.